Sidath/files/D1.foma
### sinhalaC1.foma ###

read lexc D1.lexc
define Lexicon;


define A [ක | ​ඛ | ග | ​ඝ | ච | ​ඡ | ජ | ට | ඨ | ඩ | ඪ | ණ | ත | ද | ධ | න | ප | ඵ | බ | භ | ම | ය | ර | ල | ව | ශ | ෂ | ස | හ | ළ | ​ෆ | ඟ | ඬ | ඳ | ඹ];

define B [ ව |  ව ත  ි | ව න ් න ී ය | ව න ් න ෙ ම ි | ව න ් න ෙ ම ු | ව න ් න ෙ හ ි| ව න ් න ෙ හ ු| ව න ් න ේ ය | ව න ් න ෝ ය | ව න ් න ට | ව ම ි න ් | ව ා | ව න ් න ේ ];    #######අමද 

define C [ප න ් | ප ල ් ල ා | ු ණ ු | ූ | ු ව ෙ ම ි | ු ව ෙ ම ු| ු ව ෙ හ ි|  ු ව ෙ හ ු | ු ව ේ ය| ු ව ා ය | ු ව ෝ ය | ෙ හ ි | ෙ හ ු|ව ෙ ය ි |ව ෙ ත ි |ව ේ |ි ය |ු ව ො ත ් | ු ව ේ | ි ය];   #####ඇමද 





######### Rewrite rules

define CD1Rule1  ි -> 0 || _ "^" [B | C ] ;
define CD1Rule2  අ -> ඇ ||  .#. _ ?* "^" C ;
define CD1Rule3  [..] -> ැ || A _ A "^" C ;

# To Cleanup: remove morpheme boundaries
define Cleanup "^" -> 0;

define D1Grammar 	Lexicon .o.
		CD1Rule1		.o.
		CD1Rule3		.o.
              	CD1Rule2		.o.
		Cleanup;

regex D1Grammar;
